Washington statutes.
RCW 19.31.150

Employment condition precedent to charging fee—Exceptions.

(1) Except as otherwise provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this section, no employment agency shall charge or accept a fee or other consideration from an applicant without complying with the terms of a written contract as specified in RCW 19.31.040, and then only after such agency has been responsible for referring such job applicant to an employer or such employer to a job applicant and where as a result thereof such job applicant has been employed by such employer.

(2) Employment listing services may charge or accept a fee when they provide the applicant with the job listing or the referral.

(3) An employment directory may charge or accept a fee when it provides the applicant with the directory.

[ 1993 c 499 s 5; 1969 ex.s. c 228 s 15.]